pt-BR: Design do cortador de pizza: Sistema com várias rodas; Lâmina basculante; Rolo; Tesouras; Estilo serviço; Roda; Outro
es: Diseño del cortador de pizza: Multi-rueda; Cuchilla oscilante; Rodillo; Tijeras; Estilo servidor; Rueda; Otros
ko: 피자 커터 디자인: 다륜형; 시소형; 롤러; 가위; 일체형; 휠; 기타
ro-RO: Designul cuțitului de pizza: Roți multiple; Lamă oscilantă; Rolă; Foarfece; Stil server; Rolă; Altele
sl-SI: Zasnova rezalnika za pico: Večkolesno; Zibalno rezilo; Valjček; Škarje; Strežniški slog; Rotacijska; Druga
zh-TW: 披薩刀設計: 多輪; 搖刀; 滾輪; 剪刀; 服務員風格; 車輪形; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn rezača za pizzu: Više kotača; Njihajuća oštrica; Valjak; Škare; Za posluživanje; Za kotače; Ostalo
it: Design del taglia pizza: Multiruota; Lama oscillante; Rullo; Forbici; Stile server; Ruota; Altro
bg-BG: Дизайн на резачка за пица: С няколко ножа; Люлеещ се нож; Нож „колело“; Ножици; Комбиниран за рязане и сервиране; Колело; Друго
lt-LT: Picos pjaustyklės tipas: Daugiaratis; Supuojamas peilis; Su ritinėliu; Žirklės; Serviravimo stiliaus; Apvalus; Kita
fr: Conception du coupe-pizza: Multi-roues; Lame oscillante; Rouleau; Ciseaux; Style serveur; Roue; Autre
de: Pizzaschneiderdesign: Mehrrad; Schwingblatt; Rollfuß; Schere; Server-Stil; Rad; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dizajn krájača pizze: Viackolesový; Dlhá zakrivená čepeľ; Valček; Nožnice; Servírovací štýl; Koleso; Iné
da: Pizzaskærers design: Flerhjulet; Vippeklinge; Ruller; Sakse; Serveringsstil; Hjul; Andet
tr: Pizza kesici tasarımı: Çok tekerlekli; Sallanan bıçak; Rulo; Makas; Servis tipi; Tekerlek; Diğer
sv: Design av pizzaskärare: Flerhjulsdrift; Gungande blad; Rullklämma; Saxar; Server-stil; Hjul; Övrigt
nl: Ontwerp van pizzasnijder: Meerdere wielen; Wiegemes; Roller; Scharen; Serveermodel; Wiel; Overig
cs: Provedení nože na pizzu: Vícekolečkový; Kolébkový nůž; Váleček; Nůžky; Profesionální; Kolečko; Jiné
th: การออกแบบที่ตัดพิซซ่า: แบบหลายล้อ; ใบมีดแบบโยก; แบบลูกกลิ้ง; กรรไกร; ที่ตัดพร้อมตักเสิร์ฟ; ล้อ; อื่นๆ
vi: hiết kế dụng cụ cắt pizza: Nhiều bánh xe; Lưỡi dao bập bênh; Cuốn; Kéo; Kiểu phục vụ; Bánh xe; Khác
en: Pizza cutter design: Multi-wheel; Rocking blade; Roller; Scissors; Server-style; Wheel; Other
fi: Pizzaleikkurin suunnittelu: Monipyöräinen; Keinuvateräinen; Rulla; Sakset; Tarjoilijatyylinen; Pyörä; Muu
ja: ピザカッターのデザイン: マルチホイール; ロッキングブレード; ローラー; ハサミ; サーバースタイル; ホイール; その他
pt-PT: Design do cortador de pizza: Multi-rodas; Lâmina oscilante; Com rolo; Tesouras; Estilo servidor; Roda; Outro
pl: Konstrukcja noża do pizzy: Wielokółkowy; Ostrze kołyskowe; Rolkowe; Nożycowe; Typ serwer; Kółkowe; Pozostałe
nb: Design av pizzaskjærer: Flerhjulsdrift; Gyngeblad; Rulle; Sakser; Server-stil; Hjul; Annet
el: Σχεδιασμός κόφτη πίτσας: Πολλαπλών τροχών; Λεπίδα κούνιας; Ρολό; Ψαλίδι; Στυλ διακομιστή; Τροχός; Άλλο
hu: Pizzavágó kialakítás: Többkerekes; Billegő penge; Görgő; Olló; Szervírozókanál stílusú; Kerék; Egyéb
zh-CN: 披萨刀设计: 多轮; 摇刀; 滚轮式; 剪刀式; 铲式; 轮式; 其他
ru: Конструкция ножа для пиццы: Многоколесный; Качающееся лезвие; Ролик; Ножницы; Резак-лопатка; Колесо; Другое